Washington statutes.
RCW 11.130.530

Conservator's report and accounting—Monitoring.

(1) A conservator shall file with the court by the date established by the court a report in a record regarding the administration of the conservatorship estate unless the court otherwise directs, on resignation or removal, on termination of the conservatorship, and at any other time the court directs.

(2) A report under subsection (1) of this section must state or contain:

(a) An accounting that lists property included in the conservatorship estate and the receipts, disbursements, liabilities, and distributions during the period for which the report is made;

(b) A list of the services provided to the individual subject to conservatorship;

(c) A copy of the conservator's most recently approved plan and a statement whether the conservator has deviated from the plan and, if so, how the conservator has deviated and why;

(d) A recommendation as to the need for continued conservatorship and any recommended change in the scope of the conservatorship;

(e) To the extent feasible, a copy of the most recent reasonably available financial statements evidencing the status of bank accounts, investment accounts, and mortgages or other debts of the individual subject to conservatorship with all but the last four digits of the account numbers and social security number redacted;

(f) Anything of more than de minimis value which the conservator, any individual who resides with the conservator, or the spouse, domestic partner, parent, child, or sibling of the conservator has received from a person providing goods or services to the individual subject to conservatorship;

(g) Any business relation the conservator has with a person the conservator has paid or that has benefited from the property of the individual subject to conservatorship; and

(h) Whether any co-conservator or successor conservator appointed to serve when a designated event occurs is alive and able to serve.

(3) The court may appoint a court visitor to review a report under this section or conservator's plan under RCW 11.130.510, interview the individual subject to conservatorship or conservator, or investigate any other matter involving the conservatorship. In connection with the report, the court may order the conservator to submit the conservatorship estate to appropriate examination in a manner the court directs.

(4) Notice of the filing under this section of a conservator's report, together with a copy of the report, must be provided to the individual subject to conservatorship, a person entitled to notice under RCW 11.130.420(6) or a subsequent order, and other persons the court determines. The notice and report must be given not later than fourteen days after filing.

(5) The court shall establish procedures for monitoring a report submitted under this section and review each report at least annually to determine whether:

(a) The reports provide sufficient information to establish the conservator has complied with the conservator's duties;

(b) The conservatorship should continue; and

(c) The conservator's requested fees, if any, should be approved.

(6) If the court determines there is reason to believe a conservator has not complied with the conservator's duties or the conservatorship should not continue, the court:

(a) Shall notify the individual subject to conservatorship, the conservator, and any other person entitled to notice under RCW 11.130.420(6) or a subsequent order;

(b) May require additional information from the conservator;

(c) May appoint a court visitor to interview the individual subject to conservatorship or conservator or investigate any matter involving the conservatorship; and

(d) Consistent with RCW 11.130.565 and 11.130.570, may hold a hearing to consider removal of the conservator, termination of the conservatorship, or a change in the powers granted to the conservator or terms of the conservatorship.

(7) If the court has reason to believe fees requested by a conservator are not reasonable, the court shall hold a hearing to determine whether to adjust the requested fees.

(8) A conservator must petition the court for approval of a report filed under this section. The court after review may approve the report. If the court approves the report, there is a rebuttable presumption the report is accurate as to a matter adequately disclosed in the report.

(9) An order, after notice and hearing, approving an interim report of a conservator filed under this section adjudicates liabilities concerning a matter adequately disclosed in the report, as to a person given notice of the report or accounting.

(10) If the court approves a report filed under this section, the order approving the report shall set the due date for the filing of the next report to be filed under this section. The court may set the review at annual, biennial, or triennial intervals with the report due date to be within ninety days of the anniversary date of appointment. When determining the report interval, the court can consider: The length of time the conservator has been serving the person under conservatorship; whether the conservator has timely filed all required reports with the court; whether the conservator is monitored by other state or local agencies; the income of the person subject to conservatorship; the value of the property of the person subject to conservatorship; the adequacy of the bond and other verified receipt; and whether there have been any allegations of abuse, neglect, or a breach of fiduciary duty against the conservator.

(11) If the court approves a report filed under this section, the order approving the report shall contain a conservatorship summary or accompanied by a conservatorship summary in the form or substantially in the same form as set forth in RCW 11.130.665.

(12) If the court approves a report filed under this section, the order approving the report shall direct the clerk of the court to reissue letters of office in the form or substantially in the same form as set forth in RCW 11.130.660 to the conservator containing an expiration date which will be within one hundred eighty days of the anniversary date of appointment.

(13) An order, after notice and hearing, approving a final report filed under this section discharges the conservator from all liabilities, claims, and causes of action by a person given notice of the report and the hearing as to a matter adequately disclosed in the report.

(14) Any requirement to establish a monitoring program under this section is subject to appropriation.

[ 2024 c 267 s 13; 2020 c 312 s 222; 2019 c 437 s 423.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2020 c 312: See note following RCW 11.130.915.